Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1099
Bond; amount; determination; appraisal.

For the purpose of fixing the amount of the undertaking, the value of the property taken shall be ascertained by the oath of two or more responsible persons, whom the sheriff or other officer shall swear truly to assess the value thereof.

R.S.1867, Code § 187, p. 422;

R.S.1913, § 7828;

C.S.1922, § 8772;

C.S.1929, § 20-1099;

R.S.1943, § 25-1099.

Testimony as to valuation placed on property in appraisement was incompetent. Dempster Mill Mfg. Co. v. First Nat. Bank of Holdrege, 49 Neb. 321, 68 N.W. 477 (1896).

Appraisement is not admissible as evidence generally. Barlass v. Braash, 27 Neb. 212, 42 N.W. 1028 (1889).